Utah statutes.
63J-1-602.5.   List of nonlapsing funds and accounts -- Title 64 and thereafter.

(1)  Funds collected by the housing of state probationary inmates or state parole inmates, as provided in Subsection 64-13e-104(2).

(2)  The Sovereign Lands Management account created in Section 65A-5-1.

(3)  Certain forestry and fire control funds utilized by the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, as provided in Section 65A-8-103.

(4)  The Department of Human Resource Management user training program, as provided in Section 67-19-6.

(5)  Funds for the University of Utah Poison Control Center program, as provided in Section 69-2-5.5.

(6)  Appropriations to the Transportation Corridor Preservation Revolving Loan Fund, as provided in Section 72-2-117.

(7)  Appropriations to the Local Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund, as provided in Section 72-2-117.5.

(8)  Appropriations to the Tollway Special Revenue Fund, as provided in Section 72-2-120.

(9)  Appropriations to the Aeronautics Construction Revolving Loan Fund, as provided in Section 72-2-122.

(10)  The Traffic Noise Abatement Program created in Section 72-6-112.

(11)  Certain funds received by the Office of the State Engineer for well drilling fines or bonds, as provided in Section 73-3-25.

(12)  Certain monies appropriated to increase the carrying capacity of the Jordan River that are transferred to the Division of Parks and Recreation, as provided in Section 73-10e-1.

(13)  Certain funds in the Water Development and Flood Mitigation Reserve Account, as provided in Section 73-10e-1.

(14)  Certain monies appropriated from the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund, as provided in Section 73-23-2.

(15)  The Lake Powell Pipeline Project Operation and Maintenance Fund created in Section 73-28-404.

(16)  Certain funds appropriated for compensation for special prosecutors, as provided in Section 77-10a-19.

(17)  The Indigent Aggravated Murder Defense Trust Fund created in Section 77-32-601.

(18)  The Indigent Felony Defense Trust Fund created in Section 77-32-701.

(19)  Funds donated or paid to a juvenile court by private sources, as provided in Subsection 78A-6-203(1)(c).

(20)  A state rehabilitative employment program, as provided in Section 78A-6-210.

(21)  The account for the Utah Geological Survey, as provided in Section 79-3-401.

(22)  Revenue for golf user fees at the Wasatch Mountain State Park, Palisades State Park, Jordan River State Park, and Green River State Park, as provided under Section 79-4-403.

(23)  Certain funds received by the Division of Parks and Recreation from the sale or disposal of buffalo, as provided under Section 79-4-1001.

(24)  The Bonneville Shoreline Trail Program created under Section 79-5-503.

